Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-43] Administrative procedure act.
Neither the administrative review nor the administrative hearing provided under
this part shall be subject to the contested case requirements of chapter 91.
The availability of administrative review of an order of administrative
revocation shall have no effect upon the availability of judicial review under
this part. [L 2000, c 189, pt of §23]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next